District of Columbia statutes.
34-1258.01

PEG channels; carriage requirements.

(a)

A cable operator shall provide at least 8 PEG channels on the analog portion of the cable system and at least 10 PEG channels on the digital portion of the cable system. The total capacity to be set aside for PEG channels shall be set forth in the franchise agreement.

(b)

A cable operator shall carry analog PEG channels on its basic service tier, except as may be otherwise provided in the franchise agreement.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 801
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334